Hawaii statutes.
§323F-3.5 Regional system boards.
(a) There is hereby established a regional system board of directors to govern
each of the five regional systems specified in section 323F‑2, no later
than January 1, 2008. The regional system boards of directors shall carry out
the duties and responsibilities as set forth in this chapter and as further
delegated by the corporation.

(b) Upon its establishment, a regional system
board shall assume custodial care of all financial assets, real property,
including land, structures, and fixtures, or other physical assets, such as
personal property, including furnishings, equipment, and inventory, of the
corporation within its regional system. No sale or encumbrance of any such
real property or such other financial assets, physical assets of the
corporation shall be permitted without the mutual consent of the Hawaii health systems corporation board and the appropriate regional system board. No
additional debts or liabilities or superior debts shall be added by the
corporation to any regional system board that would negatively impact the
holders of bond notes. Each regional system board shall be liable for any
liabilities arising from financial assets, real or personal property in its
custodial care.

(c) Each regional system shall be governed by
a regional system board of directors to consist of not less than seven members
and not more than fifteen members, as determined by the regional system board
after the initial regional system board is established.

(1) Each regional system board shall initially
consist of twelve members to be appointed by the governor under section 26-34
or as provided in this section, as follows:

(A) Four members shall be appointed by the
governor within thirty days of receipt of a qualified list of candidates as
follows:

(i) Two members shall be chosen from a list of
four individuals submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives
within fifteen days of July 1, 2007; provided that this list shall not include
physicians; and

(ii) Two members shall be chosen from a list of
four individuals submitted by the president of the senate within fifteen days
of July 1, 2007; provided that this list shall not include physicians;

(B) Four members shall be appointed by the
governor within thirty days from a list of eight individuals nominated by the
regional public health facility management advisory committee within fifteen
days of July 1, 2007. These individuals may be medical and health care
providers and professionals, consumers, and knowledgeable individuals in other
appropriate areas such as business, finance, and law; provided that these
individuals shall not be physicians currently in active practice;

(C) Three physicians shall be appointed by the
governor within thirty days from a list submitted within fifteen days of July
1, 2007, of six physicians nominated by a majority vote of the medical staff of
the public health facilities in the regional system present at a duly noticed
meeting from a list of qualified candidates submitted by the medical executive
committees in the regional system; and

(D) The corporation board chairperson or
chairperson's designee shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of each
regional system board;

(2) One member of each regional system board nominated
by the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate,
and medical executive committees in a regional system shall be appointed for a
term of two years;

(3) One member of each initial regional system board
nominated by the regional public health facility management advisory committee
for the regional system shall be appointed for a term of two years;

(4) The remaining members of each initial regional
system board and all members appointed thereafter shall be appointed for terms
of three years; and

(5) New regional system board members appointed to
any regional system board after the initial regional system board shall be
selected by a two-thirds affirmative vote of the existing regional system board
members.

Except for the ex officio members of each regional
system board, all other members of a regional system board shall be residents
of the region. Each regional system board shall elect its own chair.

(d) Each regional system board shall:

(1) Be responsible for local governance, operations,
and administration of the delivery of services in its respective regional
system as set forth in this chapter and as further delegated by the corporation;

(2) Include medical and health care providers and
professionals, consumers, and knowledgeable individuals in other appropriate
areas, such as business, finance, and law; provided that no more than three
members of the regional system board shall be physicians;

(3) Be as balanced and representative of the
community stakeholders as possible; and

(4) Have the powers, duties, and responsibilities
that are specific to the regional system board as provided in this chapter.

(e) Any member of a regional system board may
be removed for cause by the governor or for cause by vote of a two-thirds majority
of the regional system board's voting members then in office. For purposes of
this section, "cause" shall include without limitation:

(1) Malfeasance in office;

(2) Persistent failure to attend regularly called
meetings;

(3) Sentencing for conviction of a felony, to the
extent allowed by section 831-3.1; or

(4) Any other cause that may render a member
incapable of discharging or unfit to discharge the duties required under this
chapter. [L 2007, c 290, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 182, §10]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2007" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next